Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Reports.

Sec. 08.26.080.
Annual report.

Within 30 days following the end of each calendar year, a licensee shall submit to the office of public advocacy, Department of Administration

evidence of the continuing existence of a court ordered bond, if any, required by a court to be maintained by the guardian or conservator;

a list, including case numbers, of the wards and protected persons for whom the licensee is acting as a private professional guardian or private professional conservator;

an accurate financial statement of the licensee, including total fees collected from the protected person, total business expenses, and documents necessary to establish financial solvency of the licensee;

a letter stating that the licensee has filed all required court reports in the previous calendar year; and

a copy of all of the licensee’s federal tax documents filed with the Internal Revenue Service and all of the licensee’s correspondence with the Internal Revenue Service for the calendar year.

The office of public advocacy shall notify the department of the licensee’s compliance with (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2004; am §§ 7, 8 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Sec. 08.26.090.
Submission of court reports to department.

Upon request of the department, a licensee shall submit to the department a copy of the reports that the licensee is required to submit to a court under AS 13.26.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2004)